Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.275

Applicability of chapter to state agencies or other governmental units.

The provisions of this chapter and any marketing order established thereunder shall be applicable to any state agency or other governmental unit engaged in the production for sale of any agricultural commodity subject to such marketing order, especially those relating to RCW 15.66.150 concerning assessments. Such assessments shall be paid by the state agency or governmental agency made subject to the marketing order from the proceeds derived from the sale of said agricultural commodities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 55 s 1.]